Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-901
Grain Dealer Act, how cited.

Sections 75-901 to 75-911 shall be known and may be cited as the Grain Dealer Act.

Laws 1985, LB 389, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 507, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 735, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB894, § 1.
July 18, 2026